Missouri, session 2026, HB1931.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 544, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 544.076, to read as follows:
544.076. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law and unless determined
otherwise by a court, an arrest warrant issued for a criminal offense committed in this
state shall not be accessible through an electronic case management system until the
arrest warrant has been executed.
2. The provisions of this section amend court operating rule 2.04 relating to
access to case records, and the provisions of this section shall govern if there is a conflict
between this section and court operating rule 2.04 as it relates to the confidentiality of
arrest warrant information.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.